California statutes. Penal Code
(b) The county chief probation officer shall establish written guidelines that identify those persons on probation subject to continuous electronic monitoring authorized by this chapter. These guidelines shall include the need for enhancing monitoring in comparison to other persons not subject to the enhanced monitoring and the public safety needs that will be served by the enhanced monitoring.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.13.

A county chief probation officer may revoke, in his or her discretion, the continuous monitoring of any individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.14.

Whenever a probation officer supervising an individual has reasonable cause to believe that the individual is not complying with the rules or conditions set forth for the use of continuous electronic monitoring as a supervision tool, the probation officer supervising the individual may, without a warrant of arrest, take the individual into custody for a violation of probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.16.

It is the intent of the Legislature that continuous electronic monitoring established pursuant to this chapter maintain the highest public confidence, credibility, and public safety. In the furtherance of these standards, the following shall apply:

(a) The chief probation officer may administer continuous electronic monitoring pursuant to written contracts and appropriate public or private agencies or entities to provide specified supervision services. No public or private agency or entity may operate a continuous electronic monitoring system as authorized by this section in any county without a written contract with the county’s probation department. No public or private agency or entity entering into a contract may itself employ any person who is a participant in continuous electronic monitoring surveillance.

(b) The county board of supervisors, the chief probation officer, and designees of the chief probation officer shall comply with Section 1090 of the Government Code in the consideration, making, and execution of contracts pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Certification of Drug Diversion Programs [1211. - 1211.]

1211.

(a) In order to ensure the quality of drug diversion programs provided pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1000) of Title 6, and to expand the availability of these programs, the county drug program administrator in each county, in consultation with representatives of the court and the county probation department, shall establish minimum requirements, criteria, and fees for the successful completion of drug diversion programs, which shall be approved by the county board of supervisors no later than January 1, 1995. These minimum requirements shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) An
 initial assessment of each divertee, which may include all of the following:

(A) Social, cultural, linguistic, economic, and family background.

(B) Education.

(C) Vocational achievements.

(D) Criminal history.

(E) Medical history.

(F) Drug history and previous treatment.

(2) A minimum of 20 hours of either effective education or counseling or any combination of both for each divertee. The education and counseling program shall include education about how the use of controlled
 substances affects the body and brain, factors that contribute to physical dependence, how to recognize and respond to the signs of drug overdose, and the dangers of using controlled substances unless under appropriate medical supervision. This education shall be culturally and linguistically appropriate and may include, but is not limited to, informing program participants about the physical and mental health risks associated with substance use disorders, the grave health risk to those who are exposed to controlled substances and the extreme danger to human life when controlled substances are manufactured and distributed.

(3) An exit conference which shall reflect the divertee’s progress during their participation in the program.

(4) Fee exemptions for persons who cannot afford
 to pay.

(b) The county drug program administrator shall implement a certification procedure for drug diversion programs.

(c) The county drug program administrator shall recommend for approval by the county board of supervisors programs pursuant to this chapter. No program, regardless of how it is funded, may be approved unless it meets the standards established by the administrator, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Guidelines and criteria for education and treatment services, including standards of services that may include lectures, classes, group discussions, and individual counseling. However, any class or group discussion other than lectures shall not exceed 15 persons at
 any one meeting.

(2) Established and approved supervision, either on a regular or irregular basis, of the person for the purpose of evaluating the person’s progress.

(3) A schedule of fees to be charged for services rendered to each person under a county drug program plan in accordance with the following provisions:

(A) Fees shall be used only for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

(B) Fees for the treatment or rehabilitation of each participant receiving services under a certified drug diversion program shall not exceed the actual cost thereof, as determined by the county drug program administrator according to standard accounting practices.

(C) Actual costs shall include both of the following:

(i) All costs incurred by the providers of diversion programs.

(ii) All expenses incurred by the county for administration, certification, or management of the drug diversion program in compliance with this chapter.

(d) The county shall require, as a condition of certification, that the drug diversion program pay to the county drug program administrator all expenses incurred by the county for administration, certification, or management of the drug diversion program in compliance with this chapter. No fee shall be required by any county other than that county where the program is
 located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 481, Sec. 3.   (SB 46)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Execution [1213. - 1227.5.]

1213.

(a) (1) When a probationary order or a judgment, other than of death, has been pronounced, a copy of the entry of that portion of the probationary order ordering the defendant confined in a city or county jail as a condition of probation, or a copy of the entry of the judgment, or, if the judgment is for imprisonment in the state prison or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, either a copy of the minute order or an abstract of the judgment as provided in Section 1213.5, certified by the clerk of the court, and a Criminal Investigation and Identification (CII) number shall be forthwith furnished to the officer whose duty it is to execute the probationary order or judgment, and no other warrant or authority
 is necessary to justify or require its execution.

(2) When a person has been resentenced and there is a reasonable basis to believe the remaining time to serve in custody is less than 30 days, the information described in paragraph (1) shall be furnished to the executing officer within 24 hours. The information may be furnished by electronic means.

(b) If a copy of the minute order is used as the commitment document, the first page or pages shall be identical in form and content to that prescribed by the Judicial Council for an abstract of judgment, and other matters as appropriate may be added thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 964, Sec. 3.   (AB 2483)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1213.5.

The abstract of judgment provided for in Section 1213 shall be prescribed by the Judicial Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

1214.

(a) If the judgment is for a fine, including a restitution fine ordered pursuant to Section 1202.4, 1202.44, or 1202.45, or Section 1203.04 as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative on or before September 28, 1994, with or without imprisonment, or a diversion restitution fee ordered pursuant to Section 1001.90, the judgment may be enforced in the manner provided for the enforcement of money judgments generally. Any portion of a restitution fine or restitution fee that remains unsatisfied after a defendant is no longer on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision pursuant to Section 3451, or mandatory supervision pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, after a term in custody pursuant
 to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or after completing diversion is enforceable by the California Victim Compensation Board pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law prohibiting disclosure, the state, as defined in Section 900.6 of the Government Code, a local public entity, as defined in Section 900.4 of the Government Code, or any other entity, may provide the California Victim Compensation Board any and all information to assist in the collection of unpaid portions of a restitution fine for terminated probation or parole cases, or of a restitution fee for completed diversion cases. For purposes of the preceding sentence, “state, as defined in Section 900.6 of the Government Code,” and “any other entity” shall not include the Franchise Tax Board. A local collection program may continue to collect restitution fines and restitution orders once a defendant is no longer on probation, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision or
 after a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) In any case in which a defendant is ordered to pay restitution, the order to pay restitution (1) is deemed a money judgment if the defendant was informed of his or her right to have a judicial determination of the amount and was provided with a hearing, waived a hearing, or stipulated to the amount of the restitution ordered, and (2) shall be fully enforceable by a victim as if the restitution order were a civil judgment, and enforceable in the same manner as is provided for the enforcement of any other money judgment. Upon the victim’s request, the court shall provide the victim in whose favor the order of restitution is entered with a certified copy of that order and a copy of the defendant’s disclosure pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4, affidavit or information pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (f)
 of Section 1202.4, or report pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4. The court also shall provide this information to the district attorney upon request in connection with an investigation or prosecution involving perjury or the veracity of the information contained within the defendant’s financial disclosure. In addition, upon request, the court shall provide the California Victim Compensation Board with a certified copy of any order imposing a restitution fine or order and a copy of the defendant’s disclosure pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4, affidavit or information pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4, or report pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4. A victim shall have access to all resources available under the law to enforce the restitution order, including, but not limited to, access to the defendant’s financial records, use of wage garnishment and lien procedures, information regarding the
 defendant’s assets, and the ability to apply for restitution from any fund established for the purpose of compensating victims in civil cases. Any portion of a restitution order that remains unsatisfied after a defendant is no longer on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision under Section 3451, or mandatory supervision imposed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or after a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 is enforceable by the victim pursuant to this section. Victims and the California Victim Compensation Board shall inform the court whenever an order to pay restitution is satisfied. A local collection program may continue to enforce victim restitution orders once a defendant is no longer on probation, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision or after completion of a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(c) A defendant who owes a restitution fine, a restitution order, or any portion thereof, and who is released from the custody of a county jail facility after a term in custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 shall have a continuing obligation to pay the restitution fine or restitution order in full.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (d), and notwithstanding the amount in controversy limitation of Section 85 of the Code of Civil Procedure, a restitution order or restitution fine that was imposed pursuant to Section 1202.4 in any of the following cases may be enforced in the same manner as a money judgment in a limited civil case:

(1) In a misdemeanor case.

(2) In a case involving violation of a city or
 town ordinance.

(3) In a noncapital criminal case where the court has received a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

(e) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 683.010) of Division 1 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A judgment for court-ordered fines, forfeitures, penalties, fees, or assessments.

(2) A restitution fine or restitution order imposed pursuant to Section 1202.4, 1202.44, or 1202.45, or Section 1203.04, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative on or before September 28, 1994.

(3) A diversion restitution fee ordered pursuant to Section
 1001.90.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 242.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1214.1.

(a) On or after July 1, 2022, in addition to any other penalty in infraction, misdemeanor, or felony cases, the court may impose a civil assessment of up to one hundred dollars ($100) against a defendant who fails, after notice and without good cause, to appear in court for a proceeding authorized by law or who fails to pay all or any portion of a fine ordered by the court or to pay an installment of bail as agreed
 to under Section 40510.5 of the Vehicle Code. This assessment shall be deposited with the county treasurer as provided in Section 1463.001, and transmitted to the State Treasurer for deposit into the General Fund.

(b) (1) The assessment imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not become effective until at least 20 calendar days after the court mails a warning notice to the defendant by first-class mail to the address shown on the notice to appear or to the defendant’s last known address. If the defendant appears within the time specified in the notice and shows good cause for the failure to appear or for the failure to pay a fine or installment of
 bail, the court shall vacate the assessment.

(2) Payment of bail, fines, penalties, fees, or a civil assessment shall not be required in order for the court to vacate the assessment at the time of appearance pursuant to paragraph (1). Payment of a civil assessment shall not be required to schedule a court hearing on a pending underlying charge.

(c) If a civil assessment is imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), no bench warrant or warrant of arrest shall be issued with respect to the failure to appear at the proceeding for which the assessment is imposed or the failure to pay the fine or installment of bail. An outstanding, unserved bench warrant or warrant of arrest for a failure to appear or for a failure to pay a fine or installment of bail shall be recalled prior to the subsequent imposition of a civil assessment.

(d) The assessment imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to the due process requirements governing defense and collection of civil money judgments generally.

(e) Each court and county shall maintain the collection program that was in effect on July 1, 2005, unless otherwise agreed to by the court and county. If a court and a county do not agree on a plan for the collection of civil assessments imposed pursuant to this section, or any other collections under Section 1463.010, after the implementation of Sections 68085.6 and 68085.7 of the Government Code, the court or the county may request arbitration by a third party mutually agreed upon by the Administrative Director of the Courts and the California State Association of Counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 57, Sec. 18.   (AB 199)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1214.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if a defendant is ordered to pay a fine as a condition of probation, the order to pay a fine may be enforced during the term of probation in the same manner as is provided for the enforcement of money judgments.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an order to pay a fine as a condition of probation may also be enforced as follows:

(1) With respect to a willful failure to pay during the term of probation, in the same manner as a violation of the terms and conditions of probation.

(2) If any balance remains unpaid at the end of the term of probation, in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action.

(c) If an order to pay a fine as a condition of probation is stayed, a writ of execution shall not issue until the stay is lifted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   Effective September 9, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.

If the judgment is for imprisonment, or a fine and imprisonment until it be paid, the defendant must forthwith be committed to the custody of the proper officer and by him or her detained until the judgment is complied with. Where, however, the court has suspended sentence, or where, after imposing sentence, the court has suspended the execution thereof and placed the defendant on probation, as provided in Section 1203, the defendant, if over the age of 16 years, shall be placed under the care and supervision of the probation officer of the court committing him or her, until the expiration of the period of probation and the compliance with the terms and conditions of the sentence, or of the suspension thereof. Where, however, the probation has been terminated as provided in Section 1203, and the suspension of the sentence, or of the execution revoked, and the judgment pronounced, the defendant shall be committed to the custody of the proper officer and be detained until the judgment be complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.

If the judgment is for imprisonment in the state prison, the sheriff of the county shall, upon receipt of a certified abstract or minute order thereof, take and deliver the defendant to the warden of the state prison. The sheriff also shall deliver to the warden the certified abstract of the judgment or minute order, a Criminal Investigation and Identification (CII) number, a Confidential Medical/Mental Health Information Transfer Form indicating that the defendant is medically capable of being transported, and take from the warden a receipt for the defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1217.

When judgment of death is rendered, a commitment signed by the judge, and attested by the clerk under the seal of the court must be drawn and delivered to the sheriff. It must state the conviction and judgment, and must direct the sheriff to deliver the defendant, within 10 days from the time of judgment, to the warden of the State prison of this State designated by the State Board of Prison Directors for the execution of the death penalty, to be held pending the decision upon his appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

1218.

The judge of the court at which a judgment of death is had shall, immediately after the judgment, electronically transmit, in a mutually agreed upon format, a statement of the conviction and
 judgment to the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 49, Sec. 6.   (AB 168)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.

The Governor may thereupon require the opinion of the Justices of the Supreme Court and of the Attorney General, or any of them, upon the statement so furnished.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.

(a) If for any reason other than the pendency of an appeal pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1239 of this code a judgment of death has not been executed, and it remains in force, the court in which the conviction was had shall, on application of the district attorney, or may upon its own motion, make and cause to be entered an order specifying a period of 10 days during which the judgment shall be executed. The 10-day period shall begin no less than 30 days after the order is entered and shall end no more than 60 days after the order is entered. Immediately after the order is entered, a certified copy of the order, attested by the clerk, under the seal of the court, shall, for the purpose of execution, be transmitted by registered mail to the warden of the state prison having the custody of the defendant; provided, that if the defendant be at large, a warrant for his
 apprehension may be issued, and upon being apprehended, he shall be brought before the court, whereupon the court shall make an order directing the warden of the state prison to whom the sheriff is instructed to deliver the defendant to execute the judgment within a period of 10 days, which shall not begin less than 30 days nor end more than 60 days from the time of making such order.

(b) From an order fixing the time for and directing the execution of such judgment as herein provided, there shall be no appeal.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.5.

Notwithstanding Section 1227, where a judgment of death has not been executed by reason of a stay or reprieve granted by the Governor, the execution shall be carried out on the day immediately after the period of the stay or reprieve without further judicial proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1648.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. California Community Corrections Performance Incentives [1228. - 1233.6.]

1228.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In 2007, nearly 270,000 felony offenders were subject to probation supervision in California’s communities.

(b) In 2007, out of 46,987 new admissions to state prison, nearly 20,000 were felony offenders who were committed to state prison after
 failing probation supervision.

(c) Probation is a judicially imposed suspension of sentence that attempts to supervise, treat, and rehabilitate offenders while they remain in the community under the supervision of the probation department. Probation is a linchpin of the criminal justice system, closely aligned with the courts, and plays a central role in promoting public safety in California’s communities.

(d) Providing sustainable funding for improved, evidence-based probation supervision practices and capacities will improve public safety outcomes among adult felons who are on probation. Improving felony probation performance, measured by a reduction in felony probationers who are sent to prison because they were revoked on probation or convicted of another crime while on probation, will reduce the number of new admissions to state prison, saving taxpayer dollars and allowing a
 portion of those state savings to be redirected to probation for investing in community corrections programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 608, Sec. 2.   (SB 678)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1229.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Community corrections” means the placement of persons convicted of a felony offense under probation supervision, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision for a specified period.

(b) “Chief probation officer” or “CPO”
 means the chief probation officer for the county or city and county in which an adult offender is subject to probation for the conviction of a felony offense.

(c) “Community corrections program” means a program established pursuant to this act consisting of a system of services for felony offenders under local supervision dedicated to all of the following goals:

(1) Enhancing public safety through the management and reduction of offender risk while under local supervision and upon reentry from jail or prison into the community.

(2) Providing a range of supervision tools, sanctions, and services applied to felony offenders subject to local supervision based on a risk and needs assessment for the purpose of reducing criminal conduct and promoting behavioral change that results in reducing recidivism and promoting the
 successful reintegration of offenders into the community.

(3) Maximizing offender restitution, reconciliation, and restorative services to victims of crime.

(4) Holding offenders accountable for their criminal behaviors and for successful compliance with applicable court orders and conditions of supervision.

(5) Improving public safety outcomes for persons subject to local supervision for a felony offense, as measured by their successful completion of the period of local supervision and the commensurate reduction in the rate of offenders sent to prison as a result of a revocation of supervision or conviction of a new crime.

(d) “Evidence-based practices” refers to supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices demonstrated by scientific
 research to reduce recidivism among individuals under local supervision.

(e) “Local supervision” means the supervision of an adult felony offender on probation, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 31, Sec. 10.   (SB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.

(a) Each county is hereby authorized to establish in each county treasury a Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund (CCPIF), to receive all amounts allocated to that county for purposes of implementing this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, in any fiscal year for which a county receives moneys to be expended for the implementation of this chapter, the moneys, including any interest, shall be made available to the CPO of that county, within 30 days of the deposit of those moneys into the fund, for the implementation of the community corrections program authorized by this chapter.

(1) The community corrections program shall be developed and implemented by probation and advised by a
 local Community Corrections Partnership.

(2) The local Community Corrections Partnership shall be chaired by the CPO and comprised of the following membership:

(A) The presiding judge of the superior court, or his or her designee.

(B) A county supervisor or the chief administrative officer for the county or a designee of the board of supervisors.

(C) The district attorney.

(D) The public defender.

(E) The sheriff.

(F) A chief of police.

(G) The head of the county department of social services.

(H) The head of the county department of mental health.

(I) The head of the county department of employment.

(J) The head of the county alcohol and substance abuse programs.

(K) The head of the county office of education.

(L) A representative from a community-based organization with experience in successfully providing rehabilitative services to persons who have been convicted of a criminal offense.

(M) An individual who represents the interests of victims.

(3) Funds allocated to probation pursuant to this act shall be used to provide supervision and rehabilitative
 services for adult felony offenders subject to local supervision, and shall be spent on evidence-based community corrections practices and programs, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1229, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Implementing and expanding evidence-based risk and needs assessments.

(B) Implementing and expanding intermediate sanctions that include, but are not limited to, electronic monitoring, mandatory community service, home detention, day reporting, restorative justice programs, work furlough programs, and incarceration in county jail for up to 90 days.

(C) Providing more intensive local supervision.

(D) Expanding the availability of evidence-based rehabilitation programs including, but not limited to,
 drug and alcohol treatment, mental health treatment, anger management, cognitive behavior programs, and job training and employment services.

(E) Evaluating the effectiveness of rehabilitation and supervision programs and ensuring program fidelity.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the CPO shall have discretion to spend funds on any of the above practices and programs consistent with this act but, at a minimum, shall devote at least 5 percent of all funding received to evaluate the effectiveness of those programs and practices implemented with the funds provided pursuant to this chapter. A CPO may petition the
 Judicial Council to have this restriction waived, and the Judicial Council shall have the authority to grant such a petition, if the CPO can demonstrate that the department is already devoting sufficient funds to the evaluation of these programs and practices.

(5) Each probation department receiving funds under this chapter shall maintain a complete and accurate accounting of all funds received pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 14.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.1.

(a) Each county local Community Corrections Partnership established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1230 shall recommend a local plan to the county board of supervisors for the implementation of the 2011 public safety realignment.

(b) The plan shall be voted on by an executive committee of each county’s
 Community Corrections Partnership consisting of the chief probation officer of the county as chair, a chief of police, the sheriff, the District Attorney, the Public Defender, the presiding judge of the superior court, or his or her designee, and one department representative listed in either subparagraph (G), (H), or (J) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1230, as designated by the county board of supervisors for purposes related to the development and presentation of the plan.

(c) The plan shall be deemed accepted by the county board of supervisors unless the board rejects the plan by a vote of four-fifths of the board, in which case the plan goes back to the Community Corrections Partnership for further consideration.

(d) Consistent with local needs and resources, the plan may include recommendations to maximize the effective investment of criminal justice resources
 in evidence-based correctional sanctions and programs, including, but not limited to, day reporting centers, drug courts, residential multiservice centers, mental health treatment programs, electronic and GPS monitoring programs, victim restitution programs, counseling programs, community service programs, educational programs, and work training programs.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 33.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Addition and amendment operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

1231.

(a) Community corrections programs funded pursuant to this chapter shall identify and track specific outcome-based measures consistent with the goals of this act.

(b) The Judicial Council, in consultation with the Chief Probation Officers of California, shall specify and define minimum required outcome-based measures, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The percentage and number of persons subject to local supervision who are being supervised in accordance with evidence-based practices.

(2) The
 percentage and amount of state moneys expended for programs and practices that are evidence based, by program and practice, and a descriptive list of all programs and practices that are evidence based.

(3) Specification of supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices that were eliminated or added to increase the use of
 evidence-based practices.

(4) The percentage of persons subject to local supervision who successfully complete the period of supervision.

(5) The total amount expended from the allocation by fiscal year.

(6) To the extent that funds were not expended, the reason the funds were not spent on evidence-based practices, and a descriptive list of planned expenditures for these funds.

(c) Each CPO receiving funding pursuant to Sections 1233 to 1233.6, inclusive, shall provide an annual written report to the Judicial Council, evaluating the effectiveness of the community corrections program, including, but not limited to, the data
 described in subdivision (b).
 Each submission will include a statement that affirms the accuracy of the CPO responses and intention to use funding pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1230.

(d) The Judicial Council, shall, in consultation with the CPO of each county and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, provide a quarterly statistical report to the Department of Finance including, but not limited to, the following statistical information for each county:

(1) The number of felony filings.

(2) The number of felony convictions.

(3) The number of felony convictions in which the defendant was sentenced to the state prison.

(4) The number of felony
 convictions in which the defendant was granted probation.

(5) The adult felon probation population.

(6) The number of adult felony probationers who had their probation terminated and revoked and were sent to state prison for that revocation.

(7) The number of adult felony probationers sent to state prison for a conviction of a new felony offense, including when probation was revoked or terminated.

(8) The number of adult felony probationers who had their probation revoked and were sent to county jail for that revocation.

(9) The number of adult felony probationers sent to county jail for a conviction of a new felony offense, including when probation was revoked or terminated.

(10) The number of felons placed on postrelease community supervision, commencing January 1, 2012.

(11) The number of felons placed on mandatory supervision, commencing January 1, 2012.

(12) The mandatory supervision population, commencing January 1, 2012.

(13) The postrelease community supervision population, commencing January 1, 2012.

(14) The number of felons on postrelease community supervision sentenced to state prison for a conviction of a new felony offense, commencing January 1, 2012.

(15) The number of felons on mandatory supervision sentenced to state prison for a conviction of a new felony offense, commencing January
 1, 2012.

(16) The number of felons who had their postrelease community supervision revoked and were sent to county jail for that revocation, commencing January 1, 2012. This number shall not include felons on postrelease community supervision who are subject to flash incarceration pursuant to Section 3453.

(17) The number of felons on postrelease community supervision sentenced to county jail for a conviction of a new felony offense, including when postrelease community supervision was revoked or terminated, commencing January 1, 2012.

(18) The number of felons who had their mandatory supervision revoked and were sentenced to county jail for that revocation, commencing January 1, 2012.

(19) The number of felons on mandatory supervision sentenced to
 county jail for a conviction of a new felony offense, including when mandatory supervision was revoked or terminated, commencing January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 3.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1232.

Commencing no later than 18 months following the initial receipt of funding pursuant to this chapter and annually thereafter, the Judicial Council, in consultation with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of Finance, and the Chief Probation Officers of California, shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature a comprehensive report on the implementation of this
 chapter. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(a) The effectiveness of the community corrections program based on the reports of performance-based outcome measures required in Section 1231.

(b) The percentage of offenders subject to local supervision whose supervision was revoked and who were sent to prison for the year on which the report is being made.

(c) The percentage of offenders subject to local supervision who were convicted of crimes during their term of supervision for the year on which the report is being made.

(d) The impact of the moneys appropriated pursuant to
 this
 chapter to enhance public safety by reducing the percentage and number of offenders subject to local supervision whose supervision was revoked for the year being reported on for violations or new convictions, and to reduce the number of offenders subject to local supervision who are sentenced to prison for a new conviction for the year on which the report is being made.

(e) Any recommendations regarding resource allocations or additional collaboration with other state, regional, federal, or local entities for improvements to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 16.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.1.

After the conclusion of each calendar year, the Department of Finance, in consultation with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and the Judicial Council, shall calculate the following:

(a) The
 per capita cost to the state to incarcerate
 in a state prison and supervise on parole an offender who fails local supervision and is sent to prison.

(1) The per capita cost in this subdivision shall be calculated as the sum of both of the following:

(A) The marginal cost to incarcerate an offender in prison multiplied by the average length of stay in prison.
